New Mexico, session 2026, HB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 9-26-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007,
Chapter 200, Section 3) is amended to read:
"9-26-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Workforce
Solutions Department Act:
A. "department" means the workforce solutions
department;
B. "new Americans" means people residing in the
United States who are not citizens of the United States or
who were not citizens of the United States at birth; and
C. "secretary" means the secretary of workforce
solutions."
SECTION 2. Section 9-26-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007,
Chapter 200, Section 4) is amended to read:
"9-26-4. WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT CREATED.--The
"workforce solutions department" is created in the executive
branch pursuant to the Executive Reorganization Act. The
department is a cabinet department that includes: HB 124
Page 1

A. the office of the secretary;
B. the administrative services division;
C. the unemployment insurance division;
D. the labor relations division;
E. the workforce technology division;
F. the workforce transition services division; and
G. the new Americans division."
SECTION 3. A new section of the Workforce Solutions
Department Act is enacted to read:
"NEW AMERICANS DIVISION--PURPOSE--DUTIES.--
A. The purpose of the new Americans division of
the department is to support new Americans residing in New
Mexico in achieving their maximum economic potential in New
Mexico's workforce and as entrepreneurs. In furtherance of
this purpose, the division shall:
(1) support and expand educational,
workforce training and other initiatives that improve the
integration of new Americans into the state's economy;
(2) identify strategies for improving
licensure pathways for new Americans who have been
professionally trained or licensed in another country;
(3) assist businesses that employ new
Americans by identifying, attracting and retaining top global
talent required to remain competitive in a global economy;
(4) identify and support pathways for new HB 124
Page 2

Americans to advance priority sectors identified in the
state's workforce development and economic development plans;
and
(5) serve as an information center by
providing resources and engagement opportunities to
businesses, community-based organizations, workers, community
members, state agencies and local governments on policies and
legislation affecting new Americans, including supporting
eligible lawful permanent residents in becoming naturalized
United States citizens.
B. The new Americans division shall, as deemed
necessary and appropriate by the department, work with other
divisions within the department, the economic development
department, the higher education department, the public
education department, the department of health, the health
care authority, the homeland security and emergency
management department, the department of public safety or the
regulation and licensing department to fulfill the duties of
the new Americans division.
C. By August 1, 2027, and by July 1 of each year
thereafter, the new Americans division shall provide a report
to an interim committee that studies economic and rural
development and policy, the secretary, the governor and
members of the legislature on the activities of the division
in the preceding twelve months, including an analysis of the HB 124
Page 3

economic impact, status, population and workforce numbers of
new Americans in the state."
SECTION 4. TEMPORARY PROVISION--STATE REFUGEE
RESETTLEMENT PROGRAM--STUDY--REPORT.--
A. The new Americans division of the workforce
solutions department shall study, evaluate and prepare a
report on the work, economic impact and structure of refugee
resettlement in New Mexico. As deemed necessary and
appropriate, the division director shall consult with
stakeholders, including representatives of the health care
authority, the economic development department and community-
based organizations.
B. The division shall report its findings to the
interim committee that studies economic and rural development
and policy by December 1, 2026. HB 124
Page 4